North Carolina statutes. Chapter 125. Libraries.
Article 3. Library Records.

§ 125-18.
Definitions.

As used in this Article, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Library” means a library established by the State; a county, city, township, village, school district, or other local unit of government or authority or combination of local units of governments and authorities; community college or university; or any private library open to the public.

“Library record” means a document, record, or other method of storing information retained by a library that identifies a person as having requested or obtained specific information or materials from a library. “Library record” does not include nonidentifying material that may be retained for the purpose of studying or evaluating the circulation of library materials in general.

History.

1985, c. 486, s. 2.

§ 125-19.
Confidentiality of library user records.

Disclosure. — A library shall not disclose any library record that identifies a person as having requested or obtained specific materials, information, or services, or as otherwise having used the library, except as provided for in subsection (b).

Exceptions. — Library records may be disclosed in the following instances:

When necessary for the reasonable operation of the library;

Upon written consent of the user; or

Pursuant to subpoena, court order, or where otherwise required by law.

History.

1985, c. 486, s. 2.